Wisconsin, session 2025, AB993.
do enact as follows:AB993,11Section 1. 35.93 (2) (c) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:AB993,2,3235.93 (2) (c) 2m. Chapters of the Wisconsin administrative code removed 3under sub. (3) (g).AB993,24Section 2. 35.93 (3) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB993,2,7535.93 (3) (g) On or after the date that a chapter of the Wisconsin 6administrative code expires under s. 227.225, the legislative reference bureau shall 7remove the chapter from the Wisconsin administrative code.AB993,38Section 3. 227.114 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB993,3,29227.114 (2) (intro.) When an agency proposes or revises promulgates a rule 1that may have an effect on small businesses, the agency shall consider each of the 2following methods for reducing the impact of the rule on small businesses:AB993,43Section 4. 227.135 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB993,3,54227.135 (1) (g) If the rule is a rule to readopt a chapter of the code under s. 5227.225 (2), a statement to that effect.AB993,56Section 5. 227.137 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB993,3,197227.137 (3) (intro.) An economic impact analysis of a proposed rule shall 8contain information on the economic effect of the proposed rule on specific 9businesses, business sectors, public utility ratepayers, local governmental units, 10and the state’s economy as a whole. The agency or person preparing the analysis 11shall solicit information and advice from businesses, associations representing 12businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that may be affected by the 13proposed rule. The agency or person shall prepare the economic impact analysis in 14coordination with local governmental units that may be affected by the proposed 15rule. The agency or person may also request information that is reasonably 16necessary for the preparation of an economic impact analysis from other businesses, 17associations, local governmental units, and individuals and from other agencies. 18The economic impact analysis shall, except as provided in sub. (3c), include all of 19the following:AB993,620Section 6. 227.137 (3c) of the statutes is created to read:AB993,4,221227.137 (3c) (a) With respect to a proposed rule to readopt a chapter of the 22code under s. 227.225 (2), the agency shall prepare the analysis in accordance with 23sub. (3) (intro.). In lieu of providing the analysis under sub. (3) (a) to (g), the agency 1shall, except as provided in par. (b), include all of the following with respect to the 2rules contained in the chapter to be readopted by the proposed rule:AB993,4,631. An analysis and quantification of the policy problem that the rules were 4intended to address, including comparisons with the approaches used by the federal 5government and by Illinois, Iowa, Michigan, and Minnesota to address that policy 6problem.AB993,4,1072. An analysis and detailed quantification of the economic impact of the rules, 8including the implementation and compliance costs that have been incurred by or 9passed along to the businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that have 10been affected by the rules.AB993,4,13113. An analysis of the actual and quantifiable benefits of the rules, including 12an assessment of how effective the rules have been in addressing the policy problem 13that the rules were intended to address.AB993,4,15144. An analysis of alternatives to the rules, including the alternative of 15repealing the rules.AB993,4,20165. A determination made in consultation with the businesses, local 17governmental units, and individuals that have been affected by the rules as to 18whether the rules have adversely affected in a material way the economy, a sector of 19the economy, productivity, jobs, or the overall economic competitiveness of this 20state.AB993,4,23216. An analysis of the ways in which and the extent to which the rules have 22placed limitations on the free use of private property, including a discussion of 23alternatives to the rules that would minimize any such limitations.AB993,5,2247. A comparison of the actual economic effect of the rules being analyzed to 1any economic impact analysis that analyzed the expected economic effect of those 2rules when they were proposed.AB993,5,73(b) If an agency is proposing to readopt a chapter with changes as described in 4s. 227.225 (2) (b), the economic impact analysis for the proposed rule shall also 5include all of the analysis specified in sub. (3) (a) to (g), including the cost-estimate 6under sub. (3) (b) 1. and the determination under sub. (3) (b) 2., with respect to the 7proposed changes to the chapter.AB993,78Section 7. 227.139 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 227.139 (1) (a) and 9amended to read:AB993,5,1910227.139 (1) (a) If Subject to par. (b), if an economic impact analysis prepared 11under s. 227.137 (2), a revised economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 12(4), or an independent economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 13227.19 (5) (b) 3. indicates that $10,000,000 or more in implementation and 14compliance costs are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to 15businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a 16result of the proposed rule, the agency proposing the rule shall stop work on the 17proposed rule and may not continue promulgating the proposed rule 18notwithstanding any provision authorizing or requiring the agency to promulgate 19the proposed rule, except as authorized under sub. (2).AB993,820Section 8. 227.139 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB993,6,221227.139 (1) (b) With respect to a proposed rule to readopt a chapter of the 22administrative code under s. 227.225 (2), the costs that shall be counted for 23purposes of par. (a) shall include only those costs attributable to changes to the 1chapter as described under s. 227.137 (3c) (b) and shall not include the costs 2described under s. 227.137 (3c) (a) 1. to 7.AB993,93Section 9. 227.139 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 227.139 (3) (intro.) and 4amended to read:AB993,6,55227.139 (3) (intro.) This section does not apply to rules any of the following:AB993,6,66(a) Rules promulgated under s. 227.24.AB993,107Section 10. 227.139 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB993,6,98227.139 (3) (b) Rules to readopt chapters of the administrative code under s. 9227.225 (2) without changes.AB993,1110Section 11. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB993,6,1311227.14 (6) (c) 1. (intro.) A Except as provided in subd. 1m., a proposed rule 12shall be considered withdrawn on whichever of the following dates occurs first, 13unless it is withdrawn sooner by the agency under par. (b):AB993,1214Section 12. 227.14 (6) (c) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB993,6,1815227.14 (6) (c) 1m. A proposed rule to readopt a chapter of the code under s. 16227.225 (3) shall be considered withdrawn on the date that chapter expires under s. 17227.225 (1) unless it has been filed with the legislative reference bureau under s. 18227.20 (1) or withdrawn sooner by the agency under par. (b).AB993,1319Section 13. 227.15 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB993,6,2320227.15 (7) Rules procedures manual. The legislative council staff and the 21legislative reference bureau shall prepare a manual to provide agencies with 22information on drafting, promulgation and legislative review of rules. The manual 23shall prescribe the format for readoption rules under s. 227.225 (2).AB993,1424Section 14. 227.225 of the statutes is created to read:AB993,7,61227.225 Expiration and readoption of rules. (1) (a) Each chapter of the 2code expires on the January 1 of the 8th year after the year in which a rule creating, 3repealing and recreating, or readopting that chapter of the code takes effect as 4provided in s. 227.22, unless the rule provides for an earlier repeal date, or on the 5January 1 of the 8th year after the year in which the chapter is readopted under 6sub. (2).AB993,7,107(b) 1. Notwithstanding par. (a), a chapter of the code that was in effect on the 8effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and that is not repealed and 9recreated by a rule prior to January 1, 2036, shall expire in accordance with the 10schedule established under subd. 2. unless it is repealed earlier.AB993,7,18112. The department of administration shall, in consultation with the affected 12agencies and within one year after the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 13inserts date], establish a schedule for the expiration of all chapters described under 14subd. 1. The schedule may provide for the expiration of code chapters on any 15January 1 beginning with January 1, 2028, and ending with January 1, 2036. The 16department shall have the schedule published on the department’s website and 17shall provide a copy of the schedule to each affected agency, to the legislative 18reference bureau, and to the legislative council staff.AB993,7,2019(c) A change made by the legislative reference bureau under s. 13.92 (4) (b) 20does not affect a chapter’s expiration date under par. (a) or (b).AB993,7,2221(d) This subsection does not apply to emergency rules promulgated under s. 22227.24. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab993 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab993 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB993 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB993 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB993: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting